Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.30 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall not increase fees above the amounts established as of June 30, 2025, for:(a) A commercial shellfish harvest license;(b) A shellstock shipper license;(c) A shucker-packer plants license;(d) An export certificate;(e) Biotoxin testing; and(f) Paralytic shellfish poisoning monitoring.(2) The department shall not impose any additional licensing or use fees for commercial shellfishers, shellstock shippers, and shucker-packer plants through June 30, 2027.--- END ---